en: honey from the Gâtinais
fr: miel du Gâtinais
it: miele del Gâtinais

en: honey from the Provence
de: Honig aus der Provence
fr: miel de provence
hr: med iz Provanse
it: miele di Provenza

en: honey from Spain
de: Honig aus Spanien, spanischer Honig
fr: miel d'espagne, miel origine Espagne
hr: med iz Španjolske
it: miele dalla Spagna

en: organic honey from Romania
fr: miel bio de Roumanie
it: miele biologico dalla Romania

en: spring honey
de: Frühlingshonig
fr: miel de printemps
hr: proljetni med
it: miele di primavera
nl: voorjaarshoning

en: propolis
bg: прополис
de: Propolis
es: propóleo, propoleo, extracto de propóleo
fr: Propolis
hr: propolis
it: propoli

en: royal jelly
ar: هلام ملكي
az: Arı südü
ba: Инә ҡорт һөтө
be: Матачнае малачко
bg: Пчелно млечице
ca: gelea reial
cs: Mateří kašička
da: bidronningeføde
de: Gelée Royale, Bienenköniginnenfuttersaft
el: Βασιλικός πολτός
eo: Reĝa ĵeleo
es: Jalea real
et: Mesilaspiim
eu: Erregina-jele
fa: شاه‌انگبین
fi: kuningatarhyytelö, emomaito
fr: gelée royale, Gelées royales
ga: Glóthach ríoga
gl: Xelea real
he: מזון מלכות
hr: matična mliječ
hu: Méhpempő
hy: Մեղվակաթ
id: Royal jelly
it: Pappa Reale
ja: ローヤルゼリー
ka: ფუტკრის რძე
kk: Ара сүті
ko: 로열젤리
lt: Bičių pienelis
lv: peru pieniņš
ml: രാജകീയ ജെല്ലി
ms: Madu ratu lebah
mt: ħalib tan-naħal
nb: Dronninggelé
nl: Koninginnengelei
pl: Mleczko pszczele
pt: Geleia real
ro: Lăptișor de matcă
ru: маточное молочко
sh: Matična mliječ
sk: materská kašička
sl: Matični mleček
sq: βασιλικός πολτός
sr: Матични млеч
sv: Bidrottninggelé
th: นมผึ้ง
tr: Arı sütü
uk: Маточне молочко
uz: Apilak
vi: Sữa ong chúa
zh: 蜂王漿

en: pollen
af: Stuifmeel
ar: حبوب اللقاح
az: Çiçək tozu
ba: Һеркә
be: Пылок
bg: Цветен прашец
bs: Polen
ca: pollen
cs: pyl
cv: Шăрка
cy: Paill
da: Pollen
de: Pollen
el: Γύρη
eo: poleno
es: polen
et: Õietolm
eu: Polen
fa: گرده
fi: Siitepöly
fr: Pollen de fleurs, pollen
ga: Pailin
gd: Poilean
gl: Pole
he: אבקה
hi: पराग
hr: cvjetni pelud
hu: virágpor
hy: Ծաղկափոշի
ia: Polline
id: serbuk sari
io: Poleno
is: Frjóduft
it: polline
ja: 花粉
kk: Тозаң
kn: ಪರಾಗ ಮತ್ತು
ko: 꽃가루
ku: polen
la: pollen
lt: Žiedadulkė
lv: Putekšņi
mk: Полен
ml: പരാഗം
ms: Debunga
nb: pollen
nl: stuifmeel
nn: Pollen
oc: Pollèn
pl: Pyłek
pt: pólen
qu: Sisa
ro: Polen
ru: Пыльца
sh: Pelud
sk: Včelí peľ
sl: Pelod
sr: Полен
sv: Pollen
sw: Mbelewele
ta: மகரந்தம்
te: పుప్పొడి
th: ละอองเรณู
tk: Tozgajyk
tl: Bulo
tr: polen
uk: Пилок
uz: Chang donachalari
vi: Phấn hoa
zh: 花粉

en: caffeine
af: Kafeïen
ar: كافيين
az: Kofein
be: Кафеін
bg: Кофеин
bn: ক্যাফেইন
bs: Kofein
ca: cafeïna
cs: kofein
cy: Caffein
da: Koffein
de: Coffein, Koffein
el: Καφεΐνη
eo: kafeino
es: cafeina
et: Kofeiin
eu: Kafeina
fa: کافئین
fi: Kofeiini
fr: caféine
ga: Caiféin
gl: Cafeína
he: קפאין
hi: कैफ़ीन
hr: kofein
hu: koffein
hy: կոֆեին
ia: Caffeina
id: kafeina
io: Kafeino
is: Koffín
it: caffeina
ja: カフェイン
jv: Kafein
ka: კოფეინი
km: កាហ្វេអ៊ីន
kn: ಕೆಫೀನ್
ko: 카페인
lt: Kofeinas
lv: kofeīns
mk: Кофеин
ms: Kafeina
my: ကေဖိန်း
nb: koffein
nl: cafeïne
nn: koffein
oc: Cafeïna
pl: kofeina, kofeiny, kofeinowy, kofeinowa, kofeinowe
pt: cafeína
ro: Cafeină
ru: кофеин
sh: Kofein
sk: Kofeín
sl: Kofein
sq: Kafeina
sr: кофеин
su: Kaféin
sv: koffein
sw: Kafeini
ta: காஃவீன்
th: กาเฟอีน
tk: Kafein
tr: Kafein
tt: кәфиин
uk: кофеїн
ur: کیفین
uz: Kofein
vi: Caffein
yi: קאפעין
zh: 咖啡因

en: natural caffeine
it: caffeina naturale
pl: naturalna kofeina, kofeina naturalna

en: glucuronolactone
bg: глюкуронолактон, глюкоронолактон
cs: Glukuronolakton
de: Glucuronolacton
es: glucuronolactona
fa: گلوکورونولاکتون
fi: glukuronolaktoni
fr: glucuronolactone
hr: glukuronolakton, d-glukuronolakton
hu: glükuronolakton
it: glucuronolattone
ja: グルクロノラクトン
nb: Glukoronolakton
nl: Glucuronolacton
pl: Glukuronolakton
pt: Glucoronolactona
ro: Glucoronolactona
ru: глюкуронолактон
sh: Glukuronolakton
sr: Glukuronolakton
sv: Glukuronolakton, d-glukuronolakton, d-glukoronolakton
zh: 葡萄糖醛酸內酯

en: gum base
cs: žvýkačková báze
da: gummibase
de: Kaumasse
es: base de goma
fi: purukumin perusmassa, purukumin perusmassaa
fr: gomme base
hr: gumena baza, gumi baza
it: gomma base
ja: ガムベース
pl: baza gumowa
sv: gummibas, tuggummibas

en: tree gum, plant gum, vegetable gum
da: plantegummi
nb: plantegummi
sv: vegetabilisk gummi

en: menthol
af: Mentol
ar: منثول
be: Ментол
bg: ментол
ca: mentol
cs: Menthol
cy: menthol
da: mentol, menthol
de: Menthol
eo: Mentolo
es: mentol
et: Mentool
fa: منتول
fi: Mentoli
fr: menthol
ga: Meantól
he: מנתול
hi: मेन्थोल
hr: mentol, prirodni mentol
hu: Mentol
hy: Մենթոլ
id: Mentol
it: mentolo
ja: メントール
ko: 박하뇌
mk: Ментол
ml: മെന്തോൾ
ms: Mentol
nb: Mentol
nl: menthol
nn: mentol
pl: Mentol, mentolowy, mentolowe, mentolowa
pt: mentol
ro: Mentol
ru: Ментол
sh: Mentol
sr: ментол
sv: mentol, menthol
th: เมนทอล
uk: Ментол
uz: Mentol
zh: 薄荷醇

en: sulfite, Sulphites, sulphite, sulfites
af: Sulfiet
bg: Сулфит, сулфити
ca: sulfit
cs: siřičitan, siřičitany
da: Sulfit, sulfitter
de: Sulfit, Sulfite, Sulfiten, Sulphite
el: θειώδεις
eo: Sulfito
es: Sulfito, sulfitos
et: sulfit, sulfitid
fa: سولفیت
fi: Sulfiitti, sulfiitit
fr: sulfite, sulfites, sulphites, sulphite, bisulfite, metabisulfite, metabisulphite, disulfites
ga: suilfítí
he: סולפיט
hr: sulfit, sulfiti, sulfite
hu: szulfit
hy: Սուլֆիտներ
it: solfito, solfiti
ja: 亜硫酸塩
lt: Persulfatai, sulfitai
lv: sulfīti
mt: sulfiti
nb: sulfitt
nl: sulfiet, sulfieten
oc: Sulfit
pl: Siarczyny, siarczyn
pt: sulfito, sulfitos, metabissulfito
ro: Sulfit, sulfiții
ru: Сульфиты
sh: Sulfit
sk: siričitany
sl: sulfiti
sr: Сулфит
sv: Sulfit
th: ซัลไฟต์
tr: Sülfit
uk: Сульфіти
zh: 亚硫酸盐

en: coffee
aa: buna
ab: акаҳуа
af: Koffie
ak: kofe
am: ቡና
an: Café
ar: قهوة
as: কফি
av: къагьва
az: Qəhvə
ba: ҡәһүә
be: кава
bg: Кафе
bi: Kofi
bm: kafe
bn: কফি
bo: ཁོ་ཧྥེ།
br: Kafe
bs: Kahva
ca: cafè
ce: Къахьо
ch: café
co: caffè
cs: káva
cv: Кофе
da: kaffe
de: Kaffee
dv: ގަހުވަ
dz: ཀཱ་ཕི།
el: Καφές
eo: kafo
es: café
et: kohv
eu: kafe
fa: قهوه
ff: kofi
fi: kahvi
fj: kofe
fo: Kaffi
fr: café
fy: kofje
ga: Caife
gd: Cofaidh
gl: Café
gu: કૉફી
he: קפה
hi: कॉफ़ी
hr: kava, kave
ht: Kafe
hu: kávé
hy: սուրճ
hz: ozo-mbonde
ia: Caffe
id: kopi
ik: kuukpiaq
io: Kafeo
is: Kaffi
it: caffè
iu: ᑳᐱ
ja: コーヒー
jv: Kopi
ka: ყავა
kg: káfé
kj: okofi
kk: Кофе
kl: kaffi
km: កាហ្វេ
kn: ಕಾಫಿ
ko: 커피
ku: Qehwe
kw: koffi
ky: кофе
la: Coffeum
lb: Kaffi
li: kóffe
ln: kafé
lo: ກາເຟ
lt: Kava
lv: kafija
mg: kafe
mi: kawhe
mk: кафе
ml: കാപ്പി
mn: Кофе
mr: कॉफी
ms: kopi
mt: kafè
my: ကော်ဖီ
nb: kaffe
ne: कफी
ng: okoofi
nl: koffie
nn: kaffi
nv: Ahwééh
ny: kofi
oc: Cafè
om: Buna
or: କଫି
os: Къофи
pa: ਕੌਫ਼ੀ
pl: kawa, kawy, kawowy, kawowa, kawowe
ps: قهوه
pt: café
qu: Kaphiy
rm: Café
ro: cafea
ru: кофе
rw: Ikawa
sa: काफीपेयम्
sc: Caffè
sd: قهوو
se: Gáffe
sg: kâwa
sh: Kava
si: කෝපි
sk: Káva
sl: Kava
sm: kofe
sn: kofi
so: Bun
sq: kafeja, kafe
sr: Кафа
su: Kopi
sv: kaffe
sw: Kahawa
ta: காப்பி
te: కాఫీ
tg: қаҳва
th: กาแฟ
ti: ቡን
tk: kofe
tl: Kape
tr: kahve
tt: Каһвә
ud: кофе
ug: قەھۋە
uk: кава
ur: کافی
uz: Qahva
vi: cà phê
vo: kaf
vy: coffi
wa: cafè
wo: kafe
xh: Ikofu
yi: קאווע
yo: kofi
zh: 咖啡
zu: Ikhofi

en: coffee preparation
hr: pripravak kave
it: preparazione del caffè

en: nescafe coffee
de: Nescafe Kaffee
es: Nescafe coffee
fr: Café Nescafe
hr: nescafe kava
it: Caffè Nescafe
nl: Nescafe koffie
pt: Nescafe café
ru: Кофе Nescafe
zh: Nescafe 咖啡

en: organic coffee
da: økologisk kaffe
de: Bio-Kaffee
es: cafe orgánico
fi: luomukahvi, luomu kahvi
fr: café biologique
hr: organska kava
it: caffè biologico
nl: koffie van biologische oorsprong

en: decaffeinated coffee
bg: кафе без кофеин
de: entkoffeinierter Kaffee
es: cafe descafeinado
fi: kofeiiniton kahvi
fr: café décaféiné
hr: dekofeinizirani kave
it: Caffè decaffeinato
nl: Cafeïnevrije koffie